Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.170

License without oral examination—Reciprocity program. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

(1) Upon compliance with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280, the board may grant a license, without oral examination, to any applicant who has not previously failed any examination held by the board of psychology of the state of Washington and furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant:

(a) Holds a doctoral degree with primary emphasis on psychology from an accredited college or university; and

(b)(i) Is licensed or certified to practice psychology in another state or country in which the requirements for such licensing or certification are, in the judgment of the board, essentially equivalent to those required by this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board. Such individuals must have been licensed or certified in another state for a period of at least two years; or

(ii) Is a diplomate in good standing of the American Board of Examiners in Professional Psychology; or

(iii) Is a member of a professional organization and holds a certificate deemed by the board to meet standards equivalent to this chapter.

(2)(a)(i) The department shall establish a reciprocity program for applicants for licensure as a psychologist in Washington.

(ii) The reciprocity program applies to applicants for a license as a psychologist who:

(A) Hold or have held within the past twelve months a credential in good standing from another state or territory of the United States which has a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed psychologists as established under this chapter; and

(B) Have no disciplinary record or disqualifying criminal history.

(b) The department shall issue a probationary license to an applicant who meets the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection. The department must determine what deficiencies, if any, exist between the education and experience requirements of the other state's credential and, after consideration of the experience and capabilities of the applicant, determine whether it is appropriate to require the applicant to complete additional education or experience requirements to maintain the probationary license and, within a reasonable time period, transition to a full license. The department may place a reasonable time limit on a probationary license and may, if appropriate, require the applicant to pass a jurisprudential examination.

(c) The department must maintain and publish a list of credentials in other states and territories that the department has determined to have a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed psychologists as established under this chapter. The department shall prioritize identifying and publishing the department's determination for the five states or territories that have historically had the most applicants for reciprocity under subsection (1) of this section with a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed psychologists as established under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 425 s 1; 2019 c 351 s 1; 2004 c 262 s 12; 1996 c 191 s 70; 1991 c 3 s 202; 1984 c 279 s 92; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 76; 1965 c 70 s 17; 1955 c 305 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: "Sections 1 through 7, 13 through 20, and 22 through 26 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [May 11, 2023]." [ 2023 c 425 s 33.]

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.

PDFRCW 18.83.170

License without oral examination—Reciprocity program. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

(1)(a) Upon compliance with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280, the board may grant a license, without oral examination, to any applicant who has not previously failed any examination held by the board of psychology of the state of Washington and furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant:

(i) Holds a doctoral degree with primary emphasis on psychology from an accredited college or university; and

(ii)(A) Is licensed or certified to practice psychology in another state or country in which the requirements for such licensing or certification are, in the judgment of the board, essentially equivalent to those required by this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board. Such individuals must have been licensed or certified in another state for a period of at least two years; or

(B) Is a diplomate in good standing of the American Board of Examiners in Professional Psychology; or

(C) Is a member of a professional organization and holds a certificate deemed by the board to meet standards equivalent to this chapter.

(b) The board may adopt rules waiving any of the requirements of this subsection (1) for an applicant who has continuously held a license to practice psychology in good standing in another state, territory, or country for a period of time that, in the judgment of the board, renders the waived requirements duplicative or unnecessary.

(2)(a)(i) The department shall establish a reciprocity program for applicants for licensure as a psychologist in Washington.

(ii) The reciprocity program applies to applicants for a license as a psychologist who:

(A) Hold or have held within the past twelve months a credential in good standing from another state or territory of the United States which has a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed psychologists as established under this chapter; and

(B) Have no disciplinary record or disqualifying criminal history.

(b) The department shall issue a probationary license to an applicant who meets the requirements of (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection. The department must determine what deficiencies, if any, exist between the education and experience requirements of the other state's credential and, after consideration of the experience and capabilities of the applicant, determine whether it is appropriate to require the applicant to complete additional education or experience requirements to maintain the probationary license and, within a reasonable time period, transition to a full license. The department may place a reasonable time limit on a probationary license and may, if appropriate, require the applicant to pass a jurisprudential examination.

(c) The department must maintain and publish a list of credentials in other states and territories that the department has determined to have a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed psychologists as established under this chapter. The department shall prioritize identifying and publishing the department's determination for the five states or territories that have historically had the most applicants for reciprocity under subsection (1) of this section with a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed psychologists as established under this chapter.

[ 2024 c 371 s 9; 2023 c 425 s 1; 2019 c 351 s 1; 2004 c 262 s 12; 1996 c 191 s 70; 1991 c 3 s 202; 1984 c 279 s 92; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 76; 1965 c 70 s 17; 1955 c 305 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: "Sections 1 through 7, 13 through 20, and 22 through 26 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [May 11, 2023]." [ 2023 c 425 s 33.]

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.